Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.560

Information technology projects—Funding policies and standards.

The director of financial management shall establish policies and standards governing the funding of major information technology projects. The director of financial management shall also direct the collection of additional information on information technology projects and submit an information technology plan as required under RCW 43.88.092.

[ 2015 c 225 s 88; 2010 c 282 s 4; 1992 c 20 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—Captions not law—1992 c 20: See notes following RCW 43.105.025.